New Jersey, session 222, A812.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall establish the Go Build program, hereinafter, the "program." The purpose of the program is to increase awareness of and provide access to construction workforce opportunities and training in New Jersey. The program shall: a.     educate the public concerning construction workforce opportunities and training, and the construction industry in general in this State; b.    provide workforce training programs for the construction trades; c.     recruit workers for construction workforce training programs and construction workforce jobs; d.    engage in media advertising, marketing, website and database creation, and other related activities in order to promote construction workforce training programs, construction workforce opportunities, and the program overall; e.     partner with the construction industry and educational institutions in the State in developing and implementing the program; f.     consult with the Alabama Construction Recruitment Institute of the State of Alabama, and the Workforce Division in the Georgia Department of Economic Development, in developing and implementing the program; and g.    identify and seek assistance from other private, public, and nonprofit partners that may help in developing and implementing the program. 2.    No later than five years after the program is established, the department shall submit to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, a written report containing information on the development and implementation of the program, evaluation of the program, and recommendations for improving the program. The department shall prominently display a link to an electronic version of the report required pursuant to this section on the departments website. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.